Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 7

Purchase of Goods and Services from Persons with Disabilities

71-4-701. Purpose — Applicability.

The purpose of this part is to further the policy of the state to encourage and assist individuals with severe disabilities to achieve maximum personal independence through useful, productive, and gainful employment by assuring expanded competitive integrated employment opportunities, thereby enhancing their dignity and capacity for self-support and realizing independence and self-sufficiency.

This part applies to all governmental entities that are supported in whole or in part by the general assembly.

Acts 1991, ch. 499, § 1; 1996, ch. 827, § 1; 2020, ch. 782, § 1.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment, in (a), substituted “individuals with” for “individuals who are blind or have other”, “expanded competitive integrated employment opportunities” for “an expanded and constant market for their commodities and services” and “realizing independence and self-sufficiency.” for “minimizing their dependence on welfare and need for costly institutionalization.”; and rewrote former (b) which read: “This part covers any political subdivision of the state having its own purchasing agency and includes governmental divisions of the state, counties, municipalities, school districts or any other public bodies supported in whole or in part by the general assembly. This part and participation under this program are optional for approved, nonprofit workshops for the blind in Tennessee and such workshops may proceed under part 2 of this chapter or under this part when seeking the purchase of their commodities and services. Participation under either program does not preclude approved, nonprofit workshops for the blind in Tennessee from participating in an alternative program at any time.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 782, § 3. July 15, 2020.

71-4-702. Part definitions.

As used in this part:

“Central nonprofit agency” means the agency designated by the committee to facilitate, by subcontract or other means, the fulfillment of orders from governmental entities for commodities and services and to assist the committee in administering the program described under this part;

“Certified commodities or services” means:

Commodities and services that have been recommended by the central nonprofit agency as suitable for procurement by any state governmental entity or as suitable for statewide contracts and that are certified pursuant to procedures approved by the state procurement commission as to quality, availability, and fair market price; and

Commodities and services that have been recommended by the central nonprofit agency as suitable for procurement by political subdivisions and that are certified by the chief financial officer of the political subdivisions as to quality, availability, and fair market price;

“Committee” means the advisory committee for providing competitive integrated employment for individuals with severe disabilities, created by § 71-4-703;

“Competitive integrated employment” means employment available to individuals with severe disabilities or a customized employment available to individuals with severe disabilities, at a setting typically found in the community, at minimum wage or greater with the same benefits as nondisabled employees receive, in which eligible individuals interact with nondisabled individuals, other than nondisabled individuals who are providing services to those eligible individuals, to the same extent that nondisabled individuals in comparable positions interact with other persons;

“Governmental entity” means a state governmental entity or a political subdivision;

“Individuals with severe disabilities” means individuals who have a physical or mental impairment that substantially limits major life activities;

“Political subdivision” means any local governmental entity, including, but not limited to, any city, town, municipality, metropolitan government, county, utility district, school district, public building authority, housing authority, emergency communications district, and development district created and existing pursuant to the laws of this state, or any instrumentality of government created by any one (1) or more local governmental entities;

“Production of commodities” means packaging, assembly, distribution, or other manufacturing processes; and

“State governmental entity” means any agency, authority, board, commission, department, or office within the executive, legislative, or judicial branches of state government, or any autonomous state agency, authority, board, commission, council, department, office, or institution of higher education.

Acts 1991, ch. 499, § 1; 1996, ch. 827, §§ 2-6, 13; 2002, ch. 526, § 7; 2011, ch. 295, §§ 16, 19; 2014, ch. 739, § 1; 2020, ch. 782, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Provisions concerning occupational safety and health, referred to in this section, are compiled in 29 U.S.C. § 651 et seq.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment rewrote the section which read: “As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires: “(1) ‘Blind' means an individual or class of individuals whose central visual acuity does not exceed 20/200 in the better eye with correcting lenses or whose visual acuity, if better than 20/200, is accompanied by a limit to the field of vision in the better eye to such a degree that its widest diameter subtends an angle no greater than twenty degrees (20°); “(2) ‘Central nonprofit agency' means the agency designated by the committee to facilitate the distribution, by direct allocation, subcontract or any other means, of orders from state government for commodities and services on the procurement list among the work centers for the blind, agencies serving individuals with severe disabilities, and other entities, and to assist the committee in administering the program described under this part; “(3) ‘Certified commodities or services' means: “(A) The commodities produced with ‘value added' through manufacturing, repackaging or assembly processes; “(B) The services provided with ‘value added'; and “(C) Commodities and services that have been recommended by the central nonprofit agency as suitable for procurement by any entity of state government pursuant to this part and that are certified pursuant to procedures approved by the state procurement commission as to quality, availability and fair market price; “(4) ‘Committee' means the advisory committee for purchase from the blind and other severely disabled, created by §71-4-703; “(5) ‘Individuals with severe disabilities' means an individual or class of individuals with a physical or mental disability other than blindness, which, according to criteria established by rules approved by the committee for purchase from the blind and other severely disabled, after consultation with appropriate entities of the state and taking into account the views of nongovernmental entities representing the disabled, constitutes a substantial impediment to employment and is of such a nature to prevent the individual with such a disability from currently engaging in regular competitive employment; “(6) ‘Integrated settings' means a setting typically found in the community in which applicants or eligible individuals interact with nondisabled individuals, other than nondisabled individuals who are providing services to those applicants or eligible individuals, to the same extent that nondisabled individuals in comparable positions interact with other persons; “(7) ‘Other entities' mean entities other than work centers for the blind and agencies serving individuals with severe disabilities that: “(A) Comply with all laws including any applicable occupational safety and health standard prescribed by the secretary of labor of the United States; “(B) In the production of commodities and in the provision of services pursuant to this part, during the fiscal year utilize blind or other individuals with severe disabilities for a minimum of fifty-one percent (51%) of the man-hours of direct labor required for the production or provision of the commodities or services; and “(C) Work with agencies serving individuals with severe disabilities to identify blind or other individuals with severe disabilities for the man-hours of direct labor required for the production or provision of the commodities or services, and to provide supports necessary for their safe, productive and integrated employment; “(8) ‘Qualified agency serving individuals with severe disabilities', referred to as 'agency serving individuals with severe disabilities' in this part, means an agency that: “(A) Is organized under the laws of the United States or of this state and operated in the interest of individuals with severe disabilities who are not blind; “(B) Complies with all laws including any applicable occupational safety and health standard prescribed by the secretary of labor of the United States; and “(C) In the production of commodities and in the provision of services pursuant to this part, during the fiscal year employs blind or other individuals with severe disabilities for a minimum of fifty-one percent (51%) of the man-hours of direct labor required for the production or provision of the commodities or services; and “(9) ‘Qualified nonprofit work center for the blind', referred to as 'work center for the blind' in this part, means an agency that: “(A) Is organized under the laws of the state, operated in the interest of blind individuals, and the net income of which does not inure in whole or in part to the benefit of any shareholder or other individual; “(B) Complies with the applicable occupational health and safety standards prescribed by the secretary of labor of the United States; “(C) In the production of commodities and the provision of services, whether or not the commodities or services are procured as provided in this part, during the fiscal year employs blind individuals for a minimum of seventy-five percent (75%), or in accordance with the percentage of direct labor required under the terms and conditions of the Javits-Wagoner-O'Day Act, P.L. 92-28 (41 U.S.C. § 8502), or whichever is lesser, of the man-hours of direct labor required for the production or provision of commodities or services; and “(D) Meets the criteria for determining nonprofit status under title 48, chapter 51, part 1, and is registered in good standing with the office of the secretary of state.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 782, § 3. July 15, 2020.

71-4-703. Advisory committee — Responsibilities — Purchasing requirements for governmental entities — Applicability of part.

There is created the committee for providing competitive integrated employment for individuals with severe disabilities, and composed of the following:

The commissioner of general services or the commissioner's designee;

The commissioner of finance and administration or the commissioner's designee;

The commissioner of human services or the commissioner's designee;

The commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services or the commissioner's designee;

The commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities or the commissioner's designee;

The commissioner of transportation or the commissioner's designee;

One (1) member who is a private citizen and parent of a child with disabilities, or an individual with disabilities;

One (1) member who is a private citizen and represents agencies serving people who are blind;

One (1) member who is a private citizen and represents entities serving people with disabilities; and

One (1) member who is a private citizen and represents the business community.

The governor shall appoint the private citizen members described in subdivisions (a)(1)(G)-(J) to three-year terms.

The members of the committee shall organize and appoint a chair and determine their operating procedures. A majority of the members of the committee constitutes a quorum, and all official action of the committee requires a quorum.

Members serve without compensation and do not receive travel expenses.

The committee shall provide oversight to the central nonprofit agency in developing and implementing a state and political subdivision procurement program of commodities and services and in employing individuals with severe disabilities.

The committee shall:

Meet quarterly;

Designate a central nonprofit agency for fulfillment of government orders for commodities or services;

Require the central nonprofit agency to develop measures for evaluating its effectiveness; and

Evaluate the activities of the central nonprofit agency to assure effective and efficient administration of this part.

Every governmental entity that is supported in whole or in part by the general assembly may purchase all services or commodities required by the governmental entity from the central nonprofit agency as long as commodities or services purchased by state governmental entities are certified pursuant to procedures approved by the procurement commission and are available, and commodities or services purchased by political subdivisions are certified by the chief financial officer of the political subdivision.

This part has precedence over any law requiring governmental entity procurement of commodities or services, except laws that require purchases from nonprofit organizations operating under §§ 71-4-204 and 71-4-205; laws establishing preference for blind vendors operating under chapter 4, part 5 of this title; and laws requiring purchases under §§ 41-22-118 — 41-22-124.

This part does not apply in any case:

In which commodities or services are available from any state governmental entity;

Where the procurement commission determines that the commodities or services do not meet the reasonable requirements of a state governmental entity; or

Where the chief financial officer determines that the commodities or services do not meet the reasonable requirements of the political subdivision.

Acts 1991, ch. 499, § 1; 1996, ch. 827, §§ 7-10; 2002, ch. 526, §§ 8, 9; 2010, ch. 1100, § 137; 2011, ch. 295, §§ 16, 19; 2012, ch. 575, § 2; 2014, ch. 739, § 2; 2020, ch. 782, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The committee for purchase from the blind and other severely disabled, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2021. See §§4-29-112,4-29-242.

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment rewrote the section which read: “(a) There is created the committee for purchase from the blind and other severely disabled, which shall be composed of the following commissioners or their designees: the commissioners of general services, finance and administration, human services, mental health and substance abuse services, and intellectual and developmental disabilities. Additionally, there shall be three (3) members appointed by the governor for three-year terms who are private citizens. One (1) of these members shall represent nonprofit work centers for the blind, and one (1) shall represent nonprofit agencies serving individuals with severe disabilities. One (1) member shall represent the business community. The members of the committee shall organize and appoint a chair and determine their operating procedures. Members will serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for all necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. “(b) The committee shall provide oversight to the central nonprofit agency in developing and implementing a state procurement program of selected commodities and services from qualified work centers serving blind individuals, agencies serving individuals with severe disabilities, and other entities; shall have authority to select a central nonprofit agency to implement the procurement program; and shall recommend fair market price for commodities and services submitted to the procurement commission for certification pursuant to procedures approved by the procurement commission. “(c) It is the committee's responsibility to: “(1) Designate a central nonprofit agency to facilitate the distribution, among the work centers for the blind, agencies serving individuals with severe disabilities, and other entities, of orders of the government for commodities or services appearing on the procurement list, by direct allocation, subcontract or any other means; “(2) Review those rules and regulations that will be proposed by the central nonprofit agency and to promulgate such rules that will effectively implement this part; “(3) Conduct an annual evaluation of the activities of the central nonprofit agency under this part for the purpose of assuring effective and efficient administration of this part; and “(4) Evaluate pricing proposed by the central nonprofit agency to determine fair market price, which recovers the cost projected to produce or provide such commodities or services. “(d) All departments, institutions, agencies, and political subdivisions of this state supported in whole or in part by the general assembly shall purchase all services or commodities required by such departments, institutions, agencies or political subdivisions of this state from the central nonprofit agency; provided, that the articles or services are certified pursuant to procedures approved by the procurement commission and are available. This part has precedence over any law requiring state agency procurement of commodities or services, except laws that require purchases from nonprofit organizations operating under §§71-4-204 and71-4-205, laws establishing preference for blind vendors operating under chapter 4, part 5 of this title, and laws requiring purchases under §§41-22-118 —41-22-124. “(e) This part shall not apply in any case in which commodities or services are available from any agency of the state, or where the procurement commission determines that the commodities or services do not meet the reasonable requirements of a department, institution, agency, or political subdivision of this state.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 782, § 3. July 15, 2020.

71-4-704. Central nonprofit agency — Designation — Functions and operations — Fee.

The functions and operations of the designated central nonprofit agency include, but are not limited to, the following:

Ensure that the priorities for orders from governmental entities are maintained under this part and that opportunities are provided to individuals with severe disabilities to pursue competitive integrated employment;

Evaluate the qualifications and capabilities of entities for production of commodities or performing services. The central nonprofit agency must assure that individuals with severe disabilities are receiving competitive integrated employment in the production of commodities or performance of services. At a minimum, fifty percent (50%) of the hours worked on the production of commodities or performing services in the program are required to be provided by individuals with severe disabilities. Hours worked by supervisors with severe disabilities are to be included in the determination;

Recommend with appropriate justification, including recommended prices, suitable commodities or services for procurement and, as market conditions change, recommend price changes or revisions;

Fulfill or distribute and allocate, by subcontract or any other means, orders from governmental entities; and

Maintain the necessary records and monitor data on the entities to ensure compliance in the production of commodities and performance of services.

The central nonprofit agency shall charge a fee for fulfilling the orders. This fee must not exceed rates approved by the committee. The fee must be factored as an administrative expense into the overall cost.

Acts 1991, ch. 499, § 1; 1996, ch. 827, §§ 11, 12; 2002, ch. 526, § 10; 2011, ch. 295, §§ 16, 19; 2014, ch. 739, § 3; 2020, ch. 782, § 1.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment rewrote the section which read: “(a) Under §71-4-703, the state, through the committee, may designate a central nonprofit agency. “(b) The functions and operations of the designated central nonprofit agency shall include, but not be limited to, the following: “(1) Submit proposed rules and regulations necessary to implement this part. Such rules are to be submitted to, and approved by, the committee prior to promulgation; “(2) Ensure that the priorities for the production of commodities and services are maintained under this part and that individuals with severe disabilities are placed in integrated settings; “(3) Evaluate the qualifications and capabilities of the work centers for the blind, agencies serving individuals with severe disabilities, and other entities, to manufacture commodities or perform services and represent them to the committee under this part. In evaluating products, the central nonprofit agency must assure that the work centers for the blind, agencies serving individuals with severe disabilities, and other entities are contributing a ‘value added' to commodities or services that are being recommended under this program; “(4) Recommend pursuant to procedures approved by the procurement commission, with appropriate justification, including recommended prices, suitable commodities or services for procurement from the work centers for the blind, agencies serving individuals with severe disabilities, and other entities and as market conditions change, recommend price changes or revisions or the reassignment of commodities and services to and from the certified products list; “(5) Distribute and allocate, by direct allocation, subcontract or any other means, orders from governmental entities. The central nonprofit agency shall give a preference to work centers for the blind and agencies serving individuals with severe disabilities over other entities when initiating contracts to fulfill orders from government entities and when replacing the entity fulfilling the orders; “(6) Contract with agencies serving individuals with severe disabilities to work with other entities to identify blind or other individuals with severe disabilities for the man-hours of direct labor required for the production or provision of the commodities or services, and to provide supports necessary for their safe, productive and integrated employment. Other entities shall pay a fee to cover the cost of the services provided by the agencies serving individuals with severe disabilities and may factor this fee as an administrative expense into its overall cost; “(7) Maintain the necessary records and monitor data on the work centers for the blind, agencies serving individuals with severe disabilities, and other entities to ensure compliance in the production of a commodity or performance of a service; “(8) When authorized by the committee, enter into contracts with the state procurement system for the furnishing of commodities or services provided by the work centers for the blind, agencies serving individuals with severe disabilities, and other entities; and “(9) When distributing and allocating orders for commodities, priority shall be given to participating nonprofit work centers for the blind. “(c) The central nonprofit agency shall charge a fee to participating work centers for the blind, agencies serving individuals with severe disabilities, and other entities for facilitating participation by their work centers under this part. This fee shall not exceed rates approved by the committee. The work centers for the blind, agencies serving individuals with severe disabilities, and other entities may factor this fee as an administrative expense into its overall cost.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 782, § 3. July 15, 2020.

71-4-705. Cooperation between committee and governmental entities — Annual report of committee.

In furtherance of the purposes of this part and in order to contribute to the economy of state government, it is the intent of the general assembly that there be close cooperation between the committee and any state governmental entity from which procurement of commodities or services is required under the law currently in effect. The central nonprofit agency may enter into cooperative agreements, contracts, or other arrangements as may be determined to be necessary for the effective coordination and efficient realization of the objectives of this part.

The committee shall annually report, on or before December 31, to the governor and to each member of the general assembly concerning the number of governmental entities participating in the program, the total dollar amount of purchases, and any other information the committee deems appropriate.

Acts 1991, ch. 499, § 1; 2014, ch. 739, § 4; 2020, ch. 782, § 1.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment, in (a), substituted “and any state governmental entity” for “and any agency of the state” and “agency may enter” for “agency is authorized to enter”; in (b), substituted “governmental entities” for “work centers for the blind, agencies serving individuals with severe disabilities, and other entities” and deleted “made from the participating work centers for the blind, agencies serving individuals with severe disabilities, and other entities by state agencies” following “dollar amount of purchases”; and deleted former (c) which read: “When any state governmental unit is out of compliance with the rules and regulations set forth by the committee under the terms and conditions specified in this part, a work center may seek to recover damages in accordance with the terms and conditions specified in title 9, chapter 8.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 782, § 3. July 15, 2020.

Cross-References. Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of report, §3-1-114.